Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-602 Reports. (a) Every society
transacting business in this State shall annually, on or before March 1, unless
for cause shown such time has been extended by the commissioner, file with the
commissioner a true statement of its financial condition, transactions and
affairs for the preceding calendar year. The statement shall be in general
form and context as approved by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners for fraternal benefit societies and as supplemented by additional
information required by the commissioner.

(b) As part of the annual statement required,
each society shall, on or before March 1, file with the commissioner a
valuation of its certificates in force on December 31 last preceding; provided
that the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion for cause shown,
extend the time for filing the valuation for not more than two calendar
months. The valuation shall be done in accordance with the standards specified
in section 432:2-601. The valuation and underlying data shall be certified by
a qualified actuary or, at the expense of the society, verified by the actuary
of the department of insurance of the state of domicile of the society.

(c) A society neglecting to file the annual
statement in the form and within the time provided by this section shall be
liable for a penalty of $100 for each day during which the neglect continues,
and, upon notice by the commissioner to that effect, its authority to do
business in this State shall cease while the default continues. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2; am L 2012, c 251, §10; am L 2015, c 63, §14]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next